Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
DUTIES OF AND SUPERVISION OVER LICENSEE

§281-71 Posting of license. Every
license issued and in effect under this chapter shall at all times be
conspicuously posted and exposed to view, convenient for inspection, on the
licensed premises. For failure thereof the license may be suspended or revoked
by the liquor commission or liquor control adjudication board. [L Sp 1933, c
40, §37; RL 1935, §2606; RL 1945, §7259; RL 1955, §159-70; HRS §281-71; am L
1998, c 249, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next